South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S603.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - State Board of Cosmetology, relating to State Board of Cosmetology, designated as Regulation Document Number 5309, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Cosmetology proposes revising its regulations to add a regulation requiring all applications for initial licensure, endorsement licensure, and renewal and reinstatement licensure to be accompanied by a current 2 x 2 photograph that will be affixed to the license issued. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----